Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 456.625 is amended to read:
456.625. The Housing and Community Services Department may:
(1) Undertake  and carry out studies and analyses of housing needs within the state and ways
of meeting such needs and make the results of  such studies and analyses available to the public,
qualified housing sponsors and the private housing sector.
(2) Prepare proposals on measures  it considers necessary to address administration, housing
programs or community services programs.
(3) With the approval of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, assess fees,  charges or interest
in connection with housing programs.
(4) Encourage community organizations to assist in initiating housing  projects for persons and
families of lower income.
(5) Encourage the salvage of usable housing scheduled for demolition  or dislocation because of
highway, school, urban renewal or other public projects by  seeking authority for the public agencies
involved in such programs to use the funds  provided for the demolition or relocation of such
buildings to enable qualified housing sponsors to relocate  and rehabilitate such buildings for use by
persons and families of lower income.
(6) Encourage research and demonstration projects to  develop techniques and methods for in-
creasing the supply of adequate, decent, safe and  sanitary housing for persons and families of lower
income.
(7) Make or  participate in the making of residential loans to qualified individuals or housing
sponsors to provide for  the acquisition, construction, improvement, rehabilitation or permanent fi-
nancing of residential housing or housing development; undertake commitments to  make residential
loans; purchase and sell residential loans at public or private sale; modify  or alter such mortgages
or loans; foreclose on any such mortgage or security interest  or commence any action to protect
or enforce any right conferred upon the department  by any law, mortgage, security, agreement,
contract or other agreement and to bid for and purchase property that is subject to  such mortgage
or security interest at any foreclosure  or other sale; acquire or take possession of any such property
and complete, administer, conserve,  improve and otherwise use the property to accomplish the
department’s purposes, pay the principal and interest  on any obligations incurred in connection with
such property and dispose of  such property in such manner as the department determines necessary
to protect its interests under ORS 456.515 to 456.725 and ORS chapter 458.
Enrolled House Bill 2006 (HB 2006-B) Page 1
(8) Unless specifically exempted by the State Treasurer, deposit with the State Treasurer  any
funds held in reserve or sinking funds under ORS 456.515 to  456.725 and ORS chapter 458 and any
other moneys  not required for immediate use or disbursement by the department, subject to the
provisions of any agreement with holders of bonds entered into prior to October 15, 1983.
(9) Advise and assist in the creation of any nonprofit housing corporation, consumer  housing
cooperative or limited dividend housing sponsor  and give approval of the articles of incorporation
and bylaws of any such organization in carrying out ORS 456.515 to 456.725.
(10) Cooperate with and exchange services, personnel and information  with any federal, state
or local governmental agency.
(11) With the approval of the State Treasurer, contract for the services of  and consultation with
trustees, investment  and financial advisors, paying agents, remarketing agents and other profes-
sional persons or organizations in carrying out ORS 456.515 to 456.725 and ORS chapter 458.
(12) Contract for, act on or perform any  other duties that the department considers necessary
or appropriate  to carry out housing programs and community services programs, including but not
limited to contracting to provide compliance monitoring  or other administrative functions with re-
spect to housing developments and affordable housing, whether or not the housing  developments or
affordable housing receives department funding and whether or  not the housing developments or
affordable housing is located within this state. For purposes of this subsection, “affordable
housing” has the meaning given that term in ORS 456.055.
(13) Purchase, service,  sell and make commitments to purchase, service and sell residential loans
to the extent permitted by ORS 456.635 and 456.640 (1) to (3).
(14) Initiate or assist appropriate state agencies, governmental bodies and public or  private
housing sponsors in the development, construction, acquisition, ownership,  leasing, rehabilitation or
management of housing to carry out the purposes of ORS 456.515  to 456.725 and ORS chapter 458
where such housing is not otherwise affordable or available in the area.
(15) Execute and record written instruments that  contain terms, including but not limited to
restrictive  covenants  or equitable servitudes, pertaining to the use and enjoyment of housing
projects. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the executed instruments shall  constitute and
create restrictive covenants affecting and running with the property according to the terms of the
instruments when recorded in the records of the county where the property is located. County clerks
shall accept the instruments for recording when presented by or on behalf of the department.
(16) Subject to the provisions of any agreement  then existing with bondholders, make available
funds by contract, grant,  loan or otherwise, including loan guarantees, insurance or other financial
leveraging techniques, from moneys made available by the department to  carry out the purposes of
ORS 456.515 to 456.725, if such moneys are not needed for the operations of the department or oth-
erwise determined by the Director  of the Housing and Community Services Department to be a
necessary or prudent reserve.
(17) With the approval  of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, award grants to private
or public entities to support or develop programs that build on successful strategies that help
individuals obtain and retain housing, including through:
(a) Tenant education services for  low-income tenants, including Rent Guarantee Program
training under ORS 456.608 (3);
(b) Fair housing training for tenants and landlords;
(c) Technological innovations that help low-income individuals find and access available
rental housing; and
(d) Other education, services or resources for low-income  tenants and prospective ten-
ants and for landlords who serve low-income tenants.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of  this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 147.450 to
147.471.
SECTION 3.  The Department of Justice may assist victims of domestic violence and
sexual assault with housing needs, including through homelessness prevention,  housing
Enrolled House Bill 2006 (HB 2006-B) Page 2
search assistance, tenant education and funding for rent, utilities, moving  costs, deposits,
application fees or safe emergency housing.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2019 Act is repealed January 2, 2022.
SECTION 5.  ORS 90.427, as amended by section 1, chapter 1, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 608), is amended to read:
90.427. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “First year of occupancy” includes all periods in which any of the tenants has resided in  the
dwelling unit for one year or less.
(b) “Immediate family” means:
(A) An adult person related by blood, adoption, marriage or domestic partnership, as defined in
ORS 106.310, or as defined or described in similar law in another jurisdiction;
(B) An unmarried parent of a joint child;
(C) A child, grandchild, foster child, ward or guardian; or
(D) A child, grandchild, foster child, ward or guardian of any person listed in subparagraph  (A)
or (B) of this paragraph.
(2) If a tenancy  is a week-to-week tenancy, the landlord or the tenant may terminate the tenancy
by a written notice given to the other at least 10 days  before the termination date specified in the
notice.
(3) If a tenancy is a month-to-month tenancy:
(a) At any time during the tenancy,  the tenant may terminate the tenancy by giving the landlord
notice in writing not less than 30 days prior to the date designated in the  notice for the termination
of the tenancy.
(b) At any time during the first year of occupancy, the landlord may terminate  the tenancy by
giving the tenant notice in writing not less than 30 days prior to  the date designated in the notice
for the termination of the tenancy.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, at any time after the first year of occu-
pancy, the landlord may terminate the tenancy only:
(A) For a tenant cause and with notice in  writing as specified in ORS 86.782 (6)(c), 90.380 (5),
90.392, 90.394, 90.396, 90.398, 90.405, 90.440 or 90.445; or
(B) For a qualifying landlord reason  for termination and with notice in writing as described in
subsections (5) [ to (7) ] and (6)  of this section.
(4) If the tenancy is a fixed term tenancy:
(a) The landlord may terminate the tenancy  during the fixed term only for cause and with notice
as described in ORS 86.782 (6)(c), 90.380 (5), 90.392, 90.394, 90.396, 90.398, 90.405, 90.440 or 90.445.
(b) If the specified ending date for the fixed term falls within the  first year of occupancy, the
landlord may terminate  the tenancy without cause by giving the tenant notice in writing not less
than 30 days  prior to the specified ending date for the fixed term, or 30 days prior to the date des-
ignated in the notice for the termination of the tenancy, whichever is later.
(c) Except as  provided by subsection (8) of this section, if the specified ending date for the fixed
term falls  after the first year of occupancy, the fixed term tenancy becomes a month-to-month
tenancy upon the expiration of the fixed term, unless:
(A) The landlord and tenant agree to a new fixed term tenancy;
(B) The  tenant gives notice in writing not less than 30 days prior to the specified ending date
for the fixed term or the date designated in the notice for the  termination of the tenancy, whichever
is later; or
(C) The landlord has a qualifying reason for termination and gives notice  as specified in sub-
sections (5) to (7) of this section.
(5) The landlord may terminate a month-to-month tenancy under subsection (3)(c)(B) of this sec-
tion at any time, or may terminate a fixed term tenancy upon the expiration of the fixed term  under
subsection (4)(c) of this section, by giving  the tenant notice in writing not less than 90 days prior
to the date designated in the notice for the termination of the month-to-month tenancy or the  spec-
ified ending date for the fixed term, whichever is later, if:
Enrolled House Bill 2006 (HB 2006-B) Page 3
(a) The landlord intends  to demolish the dwelling unit or convert the dwelling unit to a use
other than residential use within a reasonable time;
(b) The landlord intends to undertake repairs or renovations to the  dwelling unit within a rea-
sonable time and:
(A) The premises is unsafe or unfit for occupancy; or
(B) The dwelling unit will be unsafe or unfit for occupancy during the repairs or renovations;
(c) The landlord intends for the landlord or a member of the  landlord’s immediate family to oc-
cupy the dwelling unit as a primary residence and  the landlord does not own a comparable unit in
the same building that  is available for occupancy at the same time that the tenant receives notice
to terminate the tenancy; or
(d) The landlord has:
(A) Accepted an offer to purchase  the dwelling unit separately from any other dwelling unit
from a person who intends in good faith to occupy  the dwelling unit as the person’s primary resi-
dence; and
(B) Provided the notice and written evidence of the offer to purchase the dwelling unit,  to the
tenant not more than 120 days after accepting the offer to purchase.
(6)(a) A landlord that terminates a tenancy under subsection (5) of this section shall:
(A) Specify in the termination notice the reason for the termination and supporting facts;
(B) State that the rental agreement will terminate  upon a designated date not less than 90 days
after delivery of the notice; and
(C) At the time the landlord delivers the tenant the notice to terminate  the tenancy, pay the
tenant an amount equal to one month’s periodic rent.
(b) The requirements of paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection do  not apply to a landlord who has
an ownership interest in four or fewer residential dwelling units  subject to this chapter .
(7) A fixed term tenancy does not become a month-to-month tenancy upon the expiration  of the
fixed term if the landlord gives  the tenant notice in writing not less than 90 days prior to the
specified ending date  for the fixed term or 90 days prior to the date designated in the notice for the
termination of the tenancy, whichever is later, and:
(a) The tenant has committed three or more violations of the rental agreement within the pre-
ceding 12-month period and the  landlord has given the tenant a written warning notice at the time
of each violation;
(b) Each written warning notice:
(A) Specifies the violation;
(B) States that the landlord may choose to terminate the tenancy at the end of  the fixed term
if there are three violations within a 12-month period preceding the end of the fixed term; and
(C) States that  correcting the third or subsequent violation is not a defense to termination under
this subsection; and
(c) The 90-day notice of termination:
(A) States that the rental agreement will terminate upon the specified ending date  for the fixed
term or upon a designated date not less than 90 days after  delivery of the notice, whichever is later;
(B) Specifies the reason for the termination and supporting facts; and
(C) Is delivered to the tenant concurrent with or after the third or subsequent written warning
notice.
(8) If the tenancy is for occupancy in a dwelling unit that is located in  the same building or on
the same property as the landlord’s primary residence, and the  building or the property contains not
more than two dwelling  units, the landlord may terminate the tenancy at any time after the first
year of occupancy:
(a) For a month-to-month tenancy:
(A) For cause and with notice as described in ORS 86.782 (6)(c), 90.380 (5), 90.392,  90.394, 90.396,
90.398, 90.405, 90.440 or 90.445;
(B) Without cause by giving the tenant notice  in writing not less than 60 days prior to the date
designated in the notice for the termination of the tenancy; or
Enrolled House Bill 2006 (HB 2006-B) Page 4
(C) Without cause by giving the tenant notice  in writing not less than 30 days prior to the date
designated in the notice for the termination of the tenancy if:
(i) The dwelling unit is purchased separately from any other dwelling unit;
(ii) The landlord has accepted an offer  to purchase the dwelling unit from a person who intends
in good faith to occupy the dwelling unit as the person’s primary residence; and
(iii) The landlord has provided the notice, and written  evidence of the offer to purchase the
dwelling unit, to the tenant not more than 120 days after accepting the offer to purchase.
(b) For a fixed term tenancy:
(A) During the term of the tenancy, only for cause  and with notice as described in ORS 86.782
(6)(c), 90.380 (5), 90.392, 90.394, 90.396, 90.398, 90.405, 90.440 or 90.445; or
(B) At any time during the fixed term, without cause by giving the tenant notice  in writing not
less than 30 days  prior to the specified ending date for the fixed term, or 30 days prior to the date
designated in the notice for the termination of the tenancy, whichever is later.
(9)(a) If a landlord terminates a tenancy  in violation of subsection (3)(c)(B), (4)(c), (5), (6) or (7)
of this section:
(A) The landlord shall  be liable to the tenant in an amount equal to three months’ rent in ad-
dition to actual damages sustained by the tenant as a result of the tenancy termination; and
(B) The tenant has a defense to an action for possession by the landlord.
(b) A tenant is entitled to recovery under paragraph  (a) of this subsection if the tenant com-
mences an action asserting the claim within  one year after the tenant knew or should have known
that the landlord terminated the tenancy in violation of this section.
(10) The tenancy shall terminate on the date designated and without regard to the  expiration
of the period for which, by the terms of the tenancy, rents are to  be paid. Unless otherwise agreed,
rent is uniformly apportionable from day to day.
(11) If the tenant  remains in possession without the landlord’s consent after expiration of the
term of the rental agreement or its termination, the landlord  may bring an action for possession. In
addition, the landlord may recover from the tenant any actual damages  resulting from the tenant
holding over, including the value  of any rent accruing from the expiration or termination of the
rental agreement until the landlord knows  or should know that the tenant has relinquished pos-
session to the landlord. If the landlord consents to the tenant’s continued occupancy, ORS 90.220 (7)
applies.
(12)(a) A notice given to terminate a tenancy under subsection (2), (3)(a) or (b), (8)(a)(B) or  (C)
or (8)(b) of this section need not state a reason for the termination.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a landlord  or tenant may include in a no-
tice of termination given under subsection (2), (3)(a) or (b),  (8)(a)(B) or (C) or (8)(b) of this section
an explanation of the reason for the  termination without having to prove the reason. An explanation
does not give the person receiving the notice  of termination a right to cure the reason if the notice
states that:
(A) The notice is given without stated cause;
(B) The recipient of the notice does not have a right to cure the reason for  the termination; and
(C) The person  giving the notice need not prove the reason for the termination in a court action.
(13) Subsections (2) to (9)  of this section do not apply to a month-to-month tenancy subject to
ORS 90.429 or other tenancy created by a rental agreement subject to ORS 90.505 to 90.850.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000,  to administer and award grants
under ORS 456.625 (17).
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of  the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, to assist victims of domestic violence and sexual assault
with housing needs under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2006 (HB 2006-B) Page 5
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2006 (HB 2006-B) Page 6